src/dictionaries/he_IL.dic
אזול/i
אזנו/i
אלץ/i
אמוד/i
ארח/i
אשש/i
באס/i
בדרו/i
בזרו/i
בטאו/i
בטלו/i
בלוש/i
בסם/i
בסס/i
בקש/i
בשלו/i
בתק/i
בתרו/i
גבבו/i
גבש/i
גדף/i
גהק/i
גחך/i
גלול/i
גלח/i
גלף/i
גפף/i
גרוד/i
דבב/i
דגור/i
דווש/i
דונה/i
דוש/i
דכאו/i
דלוף/i
דמום/i
הגר/i
היאגר/i
היאהד/i
היאות/i
היאחז/i
היאכל/i
היאלם/i
היאמד/i
היאמר/i
היאנס/i
היאסף/i
היאצר/i
היארז/i
היבאש/i
היבדל/i
היבהל/i
היבזז/i
היבחן/i
היבלל/i
היבלע/i
היבעל/i
היבצע/i
היבקע/i
היגאל/i
היגוז/i
היגזז/i
היגזם/i
היגלל/i
היגמע/i
היגנב/i
היגעל/i
היגרם/i
היגרע/i
היגרר/i
הידבר/i
הידהם/i
הידחס/i
הידחק/i
הידפס/i
הידרך/i
הידרש/i
היהפך/i
היהרס/i
היוודע/i
היווסף/i
היוועץ/i
היוורש/i
היוותר/i
היזהר/i
היזכר/i
היזמר/i
היזעק/i
היזקק/i
היזרק/i
היחבט/i
היחבש/i
היחגר/i
היחטף/i
היחלב/i
היחלץ/i
היחלש/i
היחמץ/i
היחנך/i
היחסך/i
היחפז/i
היחפר/i
היחצץ/i
היחקר/i
היחרד/i
היחרך/i
היחרש/i
היחשב/i
היחשף/i
היחתך/i
היטבח/i
היטבע/i
היטמא/i
היטמע/i
היטען/i
היטרד/i
היטרק/i
היכבש/i
היכזב/i
היכלא/i
היכמר/i
היכנע/i
היכסף/i
היכפת/i
היכשל/i
היכתש/i
הילגם/i
הילחץ/i
הילכד/i
הילעס/i
הילקח/i
הימדד/i
הימוג/i
הימול/i
הימחא/i
הימחץ/i
הימכר/i
הימלט/i
הימלק/i
הימסך/i
הימסר/i
הימען/i
הימק/i
הימרט/i
הימשך/i
הימתח/i
הינבט/i
הינגס/i
הינגף/i
הינזף/i
הינזר/i
הינחת/i
הינטע/i
הינעל/i
הינצל/i
הינקט/i
הינקע/i
הינשך/i
הינתז/i
הינתן/i
היסב/i
היסגר/i
היסוב/i
היסחב/i
היסחף/i
היסכם/i
היסלח/i
היסמך/i
היספח/i
היסקל/i
היסרג/i
היסתם/i
היעבר/i
היעור/i
היעזר/i
היעכר/i
היעמד/i
היענד/i
היעצב/i
היעצר/i
היעקף/i
היעקר/i
היערם/i
היערץ/i
היעתק/i
היפגם/i
היפגש/i
היפטר/i
היפלט/i
היפסק/i
היפער/i
היפקד/i
היפרד/i
היפרם/i
היפרע/i
היפרק/i
היפתח/i
היצבט/i
היצבר/i
היצלב/i
היצמת/i
היצרב/i
היצרך/i
היקבע/i
היקבר/i
היקהל/i
היקטם/i
היקטף/i
היקלע/i
היקצב/i
היקצר/i
היקרע/i
היקשר/i
הירגע/i
הירדף/i
הירטב/i
הירכס/i
הירמז/i
הירעש/i
הירצץ/i
הירקח/i
הירשם/i
הירתע/i
הישאג/i
הישאף/i
הישבע/i
הישגב/i
הישזר/i
הישחק/i
הישכב/i
הישכר/i
הישלט/i
הישלם/i
הישלק/i
הישמט/i
הישמר/i
הישען/i
הישפך/i
הישקף/i
הישרך/i
הישרק/i
היתבע/i
היתכן/i
היתמך/i
היתפר/i
היתקל/i
היתקף/i
הסס/i
התל/i
זוע/i
זלוג/i
זמום/i
זקק/i
זרום/i
חבבו/i
חגוג/i
חדדו/i
חדשו/i
חוס/i
חזקו/i
חלוב/i
חמול/i
חמם/i
חמשו/i
חסוך/i
חסל/i
חסן/i
חפוץ/i
חפשו/i
חקור/i
חרוד/i
חשלו/i
חתל/i
טגן/i
טוס/i
טמאו/i
טנפו/i
טפס/i
כבסו/i
כחד/i
ככב/i
כער/i
כשול/i
לגום/i
לוש/i
לטף/i
לפף/i
לקקו/i
מגר/i
מדר/i
מלוך/i
ממן/i
מנף/i
מקד/i
מקם/i
מרר/i
נאץ/i
נבא/i
נדבו/i
נהום/i
נהלו/i
נום/i
נוע/i
נחם/i
נטוף/i
נכש/i
נסוק/i
נסרו/i
נפקו/i
נקדו/i
נקז/i
נשול/i
נשוף/i
נתץ/i
נתר/i
סבוב/i
סגוד/i
סובו/i
סכוך/i
סכן/i
סלף/i
סממו/i
סנן/i
סננו/i
ספוד/i
סרור/i
סרסו/i
עגוב/i
עוץ/i
עטר/i
עכבו/i
עכלו/i
עלוז/i
עמול/i
ענג/i
עפש/i
עקל/i
עקמו/i
ערוג/i
עתור/i
פהק/i
פוס/i
פזז/i
פזרו/i
פטמו/i
פלוט/i
פלל/i
פנקו/i
פרז/i
פשק/i
פתל/i
צדד/i
צוד/i
צטט/i
צלוף/i
צמק/i
צפור/i
צרום/i
קבץ/i
קדור/i
קוב/i
קזז/i
קטב/i
קלל/i
קמול/i
קנא/i
קנח/i
קפד/i
קרר/i
רבד/i
רגון/i
רדד/i
רהטו/i
רחף/i
רטון/i
רכך/i
רכל/i
רססו/i
רצד/i
רקוק/i
רתקו/i
שבש/i
שגעו/i
שדל/i
שהק/i
שוח/i
שחד/i
שטום/i
שימו/i
שכון/i
שלול/i
שלש/i
שנן/i
שננו/i
שנע/i
שפד/i
שפול/i
שצוף/i
שקוט/i
שקמו/i
שקצו/i
שרוץ/i
שרור/i
שתף/i
תאר/i
תחח/i
תסוס/i
תעד/i
תעל/i
תרץ/i
